Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
71-6909
Physician; report; contents; form;
compilation by department.

A monthly report indicating only the number of consents
obtained under sections 71-6901 to 71-6911, the number of times in which exceptions
were made to the consent requirement under such sections, the type of exception,
the pregnant woman's age, and the number of prior pregnancies and prior abortions
of the pregnant woman shall be filed by the physician with the department
on forms prescribed by the department. The name of the pregnant woman shall
not be used on the forms. A compilation of the data reported shall be made
by the department on an annual basis and shall be available to the public.

Laws 2011, LB690, § 12.
August 27, 2011